Tennessee, session 114, SB1874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-7-303(a)(3)(A), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (i)-(iv) and deleting "Work is suitable if the work meets all the other criteria
of this subdivision (a)(3) and if the gross weekly wages for the work equal or exceed the
following percentages of the claimant's average weekly wage for insured work paid to the
claimant during that quarter of the claimant's base period in which the claimant's wages were
highest:".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1874
010032
- 1 -